Arkansas, session 2025, HB1836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-19-106(d), concerning public meetings
under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) All officially scheduled, special, and called open public
meetings shall be recorded in a manner that allows for the capture of sound,
including without limitation:
(A) A sound-only recording;
(B) A as a video recording with sound and picture; or
(C) A digital or analog broadcast capable of being recorded.
(2) A video recording of an open public meeting shall be
maintained by a public entity for a minimum of one (1) year from the date of
the open public meeting.
(3) The video recording shall be maintained in a format that may
be reproduced upon a request under this chapter.
(4) Subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to:
*LGL145*
03/18/2025 1:57:19 PM LGL145

HB1836
(A) Executive sessions; or
(B) Volunteer fire departments.
(5)(A) Cities of the second class and incorporated towns are
exempt from subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section until July 1, 2020 A
public entity shall post the video recording of an open public meeting
required under subdivision (d)(1) of this section on the public entity's
website no later than twenty-four (24) hours after the public meeting.
(B) If a public entity does not have a website, the public
entity shall post the video recording of an open public meeting to a social
media account created and maintained by the public entity no later than
twenty-four (24) hours after the public meeting.

























03/18/2025 1:57:19 PM LGL145